lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Sg +Pl %> o2 s2 z2
+Nom +Ine +Gen +All
+PxPl3 PxSg3
^A

LEXICON Root

nouns ;
finnishnouns ;

LEXICON finnishnouns
auto f ;
pöly f ;
metsä f ;
pelle f ;
keskus:kesku g ;

LEXICON f
+N+Sg+Ine:%>ss^A # ;
< %+N:0 %+Sg:0 %+Nom:0 > # ;
< %+N:0 %+Pl:0 0:t > # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:n # ;
< %+N:0 [%+Sg:0 | %+Pl:0 ] %+PxSg1:0 0:%> 0:{ni} > # ;
< %+N:0 [%+Sg:0 | %+Pl:0 ] %+PxSg2:0 0:%> 0:{si} > # ;
< %+N:0 [%+Sg:0 | %+Pl:0 ] %+PxPl1:0 0:%> 0:{mme} > # ;
< %+N:0 [%+Sg:0 | %+Pl:0 ] %+PxPl2:0 0:%> 0:{nne} > # ;
< %+N:0 [%+Sg:0 | %+Pl:0 ] [%+PxSg3:0 | %+PxPl3:0 ] 0:%> 0:{nsa} > # ;

LEXICON g
+N+Sg+Nom:s # ;
+N+Sg+Ine:ksessa # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:ksen # ;


LEXICON nouns
photo m ; ! normal o, pl -s
tomato:tomato2 m ; ! pl -es
potato:potato2 m ;
vulcano:vulcan VULCANO "tulivuori" ; ! variation
halo:hal  VULCANO "kehä" ;
vulcan m ;
bob:bob m ;
chassis m ;
boy m ;
cat m ;
boat m ;
screen m ;
bus m ;
tax m ;
class m ;
fuzz m ;
match m ;
fish m ;
ox OX ;
spy m ;
fish m ;
class m ;
fez:fezz2 m ;
gas:gass2 m ;

LEXICON VULCANO
+N+Sg:o # ;
+N+Pl:o%>s # ; ! photo pattern
+N+Pl:o2%>s # ; ! tomato p

LEXICON m
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:%>s # ;

LEXICON OX
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:%>en # ;
